Massachusetts, session 194th, H3096.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 63 of the general laws, as appearing in the 2022 official edition, is
hereby amended by adding after section 31N, the following new section:-
Section 31O. (A) A business corporation shall be allowed a credit against its excise due
under this chapter equal to $10 for each qualified remote employee for the taxable year.
(b) For the purposes of this section a “qualified remote employee” shall mean a salaried,
full-time employee, as defined by section 31C, who utilizes their primary Massachusetts
residence as their work place for at least 16 per week on average for the taxable year.
(c) The credit allowed hereunder for any taxable year shall not reduce the excise to less
than the amount due under section thirty-nine (b) or sixty-seven.
of 2

SECTION 1. Chapter 63 of the general laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
adding after section 31O, the following new section:-
Section 31P. (A) A business corporation shall be allowed a credit against its excise due
under this chapter equal to fifteen per cent of the cost incurred during the taxable year for the
purchase business and communication equipment which are essential for employees to work
remotely from their Massachusetts residence.
(b) The credit allowed hereunder for any taxable year shall not reduce the excise to less
than the amount due under section thirty-nine (b) or sixty-seven.
SECTION 3. Section 3 of chapter 62 of the general laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting after clause (20) of subsection B the following clause:-
(21) In the case of an individual who is a qualified remote employee, as defined by
section 31O of chapter 63 of the general laws, such individual may claim an amount equal to
twenty per cent of the following expenses that are incurred by the individual and related to the
individual's remote employment and not paid for by their employer: (i) internet and
telecommunications access used only for employment purposes; and (ii) office equipment,
including but not limited to, computers, monitors, landline phone, printer, workplace furniture,
and other supplies as the department may deem necessary.
of 2